Hawaii statutes.
[§11-15.3] Application to
register electronically. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
clerk of each county may permit a person who has valid government-issued
identification that is capable of electronic confirmation to submit an application
to register to vote electronically in lieu of a traditional signed application
by mail or in person.

(b) The electronic application to register to
vote shall be substantially similar in content to the application to register
pursuant to section 11-15, and shall require the applicant to provide
substantially similar information.

(c) The applicant's use of the electronic
application to register shall constitute consent for election officials to
obtain confirmatory information regarding the applicant from government
databases associated with government-issued identification, including the
applicant's signature.

(d) The applicant's signature obtained from
the government database may be utilized by election officials to validate and
confirm a voter's identity in any election-related matter in which a signature
is necessary.

(e) The online application system may require
additional information from applicants, such as security questions to
authenticate any future voter registration transactions by the applicant. [L
2012, c 225, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next